da: Skalamodelsæts påkrævede samling: Kræver lim og maling; Kræver lim; Indeholder formonterede sektioner; Indeholder formalede dele; Kræver maling; Kræver tilskæring/tilpasning af dele; Kræver påsætning af overføringsmærker; Kræver slibning/filing; Kræver lodning/ledningsføring; Klikkes sammen (ingen lim); Andet
sv: Skalmodell – monteringskrav för byggsats: Lim och färg krävs; Lim krävs; Innehåller förmonterade sektioner; Innehåller färdigmålade delar; Färg krävs; Kräver skärning/trimning av delar; Kräver applicering av dekaler; Kräver slipning/filning; Kräver lödning/kabeldragning; Klickmontering (inget lim); Övrigt
hu: Makettkészlet összeszerelési követelményei: Ragasztás és festés szükséges; Ragasztás szükséges; Előre összeszerelt részeket tartalmaz; Előre festett alkatrészeket tartalmaz; Festés szükséges; Alkatrészek méretre vágása szükséges; Matricák felhelyezése szükséges; Csiszolás/reszelés szükséges; Forrasztás/vezetékezés szükséges; Bepattintható (ragasztó nélkül); Egyéb
fi: Pienoismallipakkauksen kokoaminen: Vaatii liimaa ja maalia; Vaatii liimaa; Sisältää valmiiksi koottuja osia; Sisältää valmiiksi maalattuja osia; Vaatii maalia; Vaatii osien leikkaamista/viimeistelyä; Vaatii siirtokuvien kiinnittämistä; Vaatii hiontaa/viilausta; Vaatii juottamista/johdotusta; Napsautettava (ei liimaa); Muu
hr-HR: Zahtjevi za kompletnu montažu makete: Potrebno je ljepilo i boja; Potrebno je ljepilo; Uključuje unaprijed sastavljene dijelove; Uključuje unaprijed obojene dijelove; Potrebna je boja; Zahtijeva rezanje/obrezivanje dijelova; Zahtijeva nanošenje naljepnica; Zahtijeva brušenje/turpijanje; Zahtijeva lemljenje/ožičenje; Na uklapanje (bez ljepila); Ostalo
ru: Требования к сборке набора масштабной модели: Требуются клей и краска; Требуется клей; Включает предварительно собранные узлы; Включает предварительно окрашенные детали; Требуется краска; Требуется резка/подгонка деталей; Требуется нанесение декалей; Требуется шлифовка/обработка напильником; Требуется пайка/прокладка проводов; Сборка на защёлках (без клея); Другое
es: Requisitos de montaje del kit del modelo a escala: Requiere pegamento y pintura; Requiere pegamento; Incluye secciones preensambladas; Incluye piezas prepintadas; Requiere pintura; Requiere cortar/recortar piezas; Requiere aplicación de calcomanías; Requiere lijar/limar; Requiere soldadura/cableado; A presión (sin pegamento); Otro
bg-BG: Изисквания за сглобяване на комплект умален модел: Изисква лепило и боя; Изисква лепило; Включва предварително сглобени секции; Включва предварително боядисани части; Изисква боя; Изисква изрязване/почистване на частите; Изисква поставяне на декали; Изисква шлайфане/пилене; Изисква запояване/окабеляване; Сглобяване чрез щракване (без лепило); Друго
pl: Wymagania montażowe zestawu modelu w skali: Wymagany klej i farba; Wymagany klej; Zawiera wstępnie zmontowane sekcje; Zawiera wstępnie pomalowane części; Wymagana farba; Wymaga wycinania/przycinania części; Wymaga nałożenia kalkomanii; Wymaga szlifowania/piłowania; Wymaga lutowania/okablowania; Montaż na wcisk (bez kleju); Inne
tr: Ölçekli model kit montaj gereksinimleri: Yapıştırıcı ve boya gerekir; Yapıştırıcı gerekir; Önceden monte edilmiş kısımlar içerir; Önceden boyanmış parçalar içerir; Boya gerekir; Parçaların kesilmesi/düzeltilmesi gerekir; Dekal uygulaması gerekir; Zımparalama/eğeleme gerekir; Lehimleme/kablolama gerekir; Geçmeli (yapıştırıcısız); Diğer
vi: Yêu cầu lắp ráp bộ mô hình tỷ lệ: Cần dùng keo và sơn; Cần dùng keo; Bao gồm các phần lắp ráp sẵn; Bao gồm các bộ phận sơn sẵn; Cần dùng sơn; Cần cắt/gọt các bộ phận; Cần dán decal; Cần chà nhám/dũa; Cần hàn/đi dây điện; Lắp khớp (không cần keo); Khác
sk-SK: Požiadavky na zostavenie zmenšeného modelu: Vyžaduje sa lepidlo a farba; Vyžaduje sa lepidlo; Obsahuje predzostavené časti; Obsahuje predlakované diely; Vyžaduje sa farba; Vyžaduje rezanie/zastrihávanie dielov; Vyžaduje aplikáciu obtlačkov; Vyžaduje brúsenie/pilovanie; Vyžaduje spájkovanie/zapájanie; Zacvakávacie (bez použitia lepidla); Iné
lt-LT: Mastelinio modelio rinkinio surinkimo reikalavimai: Reikia klijų ir dažų; Reikia klijų; Yra iš anksto surinktų dalių; Yra iš anksto nudažytų dalių; Reikia dažų; Reikia pjaustyti / apdailinti dalis; Reikia užklijuoti dekalus; Reikia šlifuoti / dildyti; Reikia lituoti / tiesti laidus; Surenkamas be klijų; Kita
de: Montageanforderungen des Modellbausatzes: Kleber und Farbe erforderlich; Kleber erforderlich; Enthält vormontierte Teile; Enthält vorbemalte Teile; Farbe erforderlich; Zuschneiden/Trimmen von Teilen erforderlich; Anbringen von Abziehbildern erforderlich; Schleifen/Feilen erforderlich; Löten/Verkabeln erforderlich; Stecksystem (ohne Kleber); Sonstige
ro-RO: Cerințele de asamblare ale kitului de model la scară: Necesită lipici și vopsea; Necesită lipici; Include secțiuni pre-asamblate; Include piese pre-vopsite; Necesită vopsea; Necesită tăierea/ajustarea pieselor; Necesită aplicarea decalurilor; Necesită șlefuire/pilire; Necesită lipire(cositorire)/cablare; Îmbinare prin presare/clic (fără lipici); Altele
ja: スケールモデルキットの組み立て要件: 接着剤と塗料が必要; 接着剤が必要; 一部組み立て済み; 塗装済み部品を含む; 塗装が必要; 部品の切断/トリミングが必要; デカールの貼り付けが必要; 研磨/ヤスリがけが必要; はんだ付け/配線が必要; スナップフィット (接着剤不要); その他
pt-PT: Requisitos de montagem do kit do modelo em escala: Requer cola e tinta; Requer cola; Inclui secções pré-montadas; Inclui peças pré-pintadas; Requer tinta; Requer corte/aparo de peças; Requer aplicação de decalques; Requer lixagem/limagem; Requer soldadura/cablagem; Encaixe (sem cola); Outro
fr: Exigences d’assemblage du kit de maquette: Colle et peinture requises; Colle requise; Comprend des sections pré-assemblées; Comprend des pièces pré-peintes; Peinture requise; Découpe/ébarbage des pièces requis; Application de décalcomanies requise; Ponçage/limage requis; Soudage/câblage requis; Emboîtable (sans colle); Autre
nb: Krav til montering av skalamodellsett: Lim og maling kreves; Lim kreves; Inkluderer forhåndsmonterte deler; Inkluderer forhåndsmalte deler; Maling kreves; Krever kutting/trimming av deler; Krever påføring av dekaler; Krever pussing/filing; Krever lodding/kabling; Klikkmontering (uten lim); Annet
en: Scale model kit assembly requirements: Glue and paint required; Glue required; Includes pre-assembled sections; Includes pre-painted parts; Paint required; Requires cutting/trimming parts; Requires decals application; Requires sanding/filing; Requires soldering/wiring; Snap-fit (no glue); Other
it: Requisiti per l'assemblaggio del kit del modellino in scala: Colla e vernice necessarie; Colla necessaria; Include sezioni preassemblate; Include parti preverniciate; Vernice necessaria; Richiede il taglio/la rifinitura delle parti; Richiede l'applicazione di decalcomanie; Richiede levigatura/limatura; Richiede saldatura/cablaggio; A incastro (senza colla); Altro
pt-BR: Kit de modelo em escala requisitos de montagem: Requer cola e tinta; Requer cola; Inclui seções pré-montadas; Inclui peças pré-pintadas; Requer tinta; Requer corte/aparagem de peças; Requer aplicação de decalques; Requer lixamento/limagem; Requer soldagem/fiação; Montagem por encaixe (sem cola); Outros
nl: Schaalmodelkit montagevereisten: Lijm en verf vereist; Lijm vereist; Inclusief voorgemonteerde secties; Inclusief voorgeschilderde onderdelen; Verf vereist; Vereist snijden/bijsnijden van onderdelen; Aanbrengen van decals vereist; Vereist schuren/vijlen; Vereist solderen/bedrading; Kliksysteem (geen lijm); Overig
zh-CN: 比例模型套件组装要求: 需要胶水和涂料; 需要胶水; 包含预拼装部分; 包含预涂装零件; 需要涂装; 需要切割/修剪零件; 需要贴花; 需要打磨/锉削; 需要焊接/接线; 按扣拼装（免胶水）; 其他
sl-SI: Zahteve za sestavljanje kompleta makete: Potrebno lepilo in barva; Potrebno lepilo; Vključuje predhodno sestavljene dele; Vključuje predhodno barvane dele; Potrebna barva; Potrebno rezanje/obrezovanje delov; Potrebno nameščanje preslikačev; Potrebno brušenje/piljenje; Potrebno spajkanje/ožičenje; Zaskočno (brez lepila); Drugo
th: ขยายสเกลโมเดลข้อกำหนดในการประกอบ: ต้องใช้กาวและสี; ต้องใช้กาว; มีส่วนที่ประกอบไว้ล่วงหน้า; มีชิ้นส่วนที่ทาสีไว้ล่วงหน้า; ต้องใช้สี; ต้องตัด/ตกแต่งชิ้นส่วน; ต้องติดรูปลอก; ต้องขัด/ตะไบ; ต้องบัดกรี/เดินสายไฟ; ประกอบแบบล็อกสลัก (ไม่ใช้กาว); อื่นๆ
ko: 축척 모델 키트 조립 요구 사항: 접착제 및 페인트 필요; 접착제 필요; 사전 조립 섹션 포함; 사전 도색 부품 포함; 페인트 필요; 부품 절단/다듬기 필요; 데칼 부착 필요; 샌딩/연마 필요; 납땜/배선 필요; 스냅핏(접착제 불필요); 기타
cs: Požadavky na sestavení sady modelu v měřítku: Vyžaduje lepidlo a barvu; Vyžaduje lepidlo; Obsahuje předmontované části; Obsahuje předbarvené díly; Vyžaduje barvu; Vyžaduje řezání / ořezávání dílů; Vyžaduje aplikaci obtisků; Vyžaduje broušení/pilování; Vyžaduje pájení / zapojování; Zacvakávací (bez lepidla); Jiné
zh-TW: 比例模型套件組裝要求: 需使用黏著劑與顏料; 需使用黏著劑; 包含預先組裝的部件; 包含預先上色的零件; 需使用顏料; 需裁切/修剪零件; 需貼上轉印貼紙; 需打磨/銼平; 需焊接/配線; 卡榫組裝 (免黏著劑); 其他
el: Απαιτήσεις συναρμολόγησης κιτ μοντέλου κλίμακας: Απαιτείται κόλλα και χρώμα; Απαιτείται κόλλα; Περιλαμβάνει προσυναρμολογημένα τμήματα; Περιλαμβάνει προβαμμένα μέρη; Απαιτείται χρώμα; Απαιτείται κοπή/περικοπή μερών; Απαιτείται εφαρμογή χαλκομανιών; Απαιτείται τρίψιμο/λιμάρισμα; Απαιτείται συγκόλληση/καλωδίωση; Κουμπωτό (χωρίς κόλλα); Άλλο